Washington statutes.
RCW 24.12.045

Annual report—Secretary of state's powers.

(1) Each corporation sole registered in this state shall deliver an annual report to the secretary of state in accordance with RCW 23.95.255. The report shall be executed by the corporation sole by an officer of the corporation sole or, if the corporation sole is in the hands of a receiver or trustee, it shall be executed on behalf of the corporation sole by such receiver or trustee.

(2) The secretary of state may provide that correcting or updating information appearing on previous annual or biennial filings is sufficient to constitute the current filing.

(3) The secretary may administratively dissolve a corporation sole that does not comply with this section in accordance with RCW 23.95.610. However, the secretary shall reinstate a corporation sole administratively dissolved under this subsection if the corporation sole complies with the requirements of RCW 24.12.055 within five years of the administrative dissolution.

[ 2015 c 176 s 9113; 2009 c 437 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.